Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1131.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the Office of
Juvenile Affairs, from any monies not otherwise appropriated from
the Statewide Recovery Fund (497) of the State Treasury, the sum of
Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may be
necessary to address gaps in the youth services program. Such funds
shall be utilized in a manner consistent with the recommendations
adopted by the Joint Committee on Pandemic Relief Funding on April
15, 2026.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

Passed the Senate the 21st day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 27th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1131 Page 2